pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Żegluga i sporty wodne > Wingfoiling > Części do wingfoila > Części do winga: Tuby wewnętrzne do skrzydeł; Uchwyty do skrzydeł; Zawory do skrzydeł
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Plovba in vodni športi > Foilanje > Deli za foilanje > Deli krila: Krila za wingsurfanje; Ročaji za wingsurfanje; Ventili za krila za wingsurfanje
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Csónakázás és vízi sportok > Szárnyszörfözés > Szárnyszörfözés alkatrészek > Szárnyalkatrészek: Wing légkamrák; Wing fogantyúk; Wing szelepek
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 보트 놀이/수상 스포츠 > 윙포일링 > 윙포일 부품 > 윙 부품: 윙 블래더; 윙 핸들; 윙 밸브
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Båt- och vattensporter > Wingfoiling > Wingfoil-delar > Vingdelar: Bladders för vingar; Handtag för vingar; Ventiler för vingar
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Plaukiojimas valtimis ir vandens sportas > Aitvaravimas > Aitvaravimo dalys > Sparnų dalys: Sparnų pūslės; Sparnų rankenos; Sparnų vožtuvai
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Ναυσιπλοΐα & θαλάσσια σπορ > Wingfoiling > Ανταλλακτικά Wingfoil > Ανταλλακτικά φτερού: Αεροθάλαμοι (bladders) wing; Λαβές wing; Βαλβίδες wing
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Sejling og vandsport > Wingsurfing > Dele til wingsurfing > Dele til vinger: Wing-bladders; Wing-håndtag; Wing-ventiler
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Člnkovanie a vodné športy > Wingfoiling > Diely wingfoilingu > Časti krídel: Krídelné mechy; Rukoväte na krídla; Krídlové ventily
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Plaisance et sports nautiques > Wingfoil > Pièces de wingfoil > Pièces d’ailes: Boudins d’aile; Poignées d’aile; Valves d’aile
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Chèo thuyền và thể thao dưới nước > Lướt ván cánh > Linh kiện lướt ván cánh > Linh kiện cánh buồm: Ruột bơm hơi cánh diều; Tay cầm cánh diều; Van cánh diều
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Sport acquatici > Wingfoil > Parti del wingfoil > Parti dell'ala: Bladder per wing; Maniglie per wing; Valvole per wing
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Desportos náuticos e aquáticos > Wingfoil > Peças de wingfoil > Peças de asa: Câmaras de ar para wings; Pegas para wings; Válvulas para wings
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 水上運動 > 水翼風翼 > 水翼風翼零件 > 風翼零件: 風翼內膽; 風翼把手; 風翼氣門
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Плаване с лодка и водни спортове > Уиндфойл > Части за уингфойл > Части за крило: Вътрешни балони за крила; Ръкохватки за крила; Клапи за крила
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Veneily ja vesiurheilu > Foilpurjelautailu > Foilpurjelautailuosat > Siipien osat: Siiven sisäkumit; Siiven kahvat; Siiven venttiilit
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Båt og vannsport > Wingfoiling > Wingfoil-deler > Vingedeler: Vingeblærer; Vingehåndtak; Vingeventiler
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Kayıkçılık ve Su Sporları > Wingfoil > Wingfoil Parçaları > Kanat Parçaları: Wing iç tüpleri; Wing tutamaçları; Wing valfleri
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > กีฬาทางเรือและทางน้ำ > วิงฟอยล์ > ชิ้นส่วนวิงฟอยล์ > ชิ้นส่วนปีก: ถุงลมด้านในปีก; มือจับปีก; วาล์วปีก
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Boten en watersport > Wingfoilen > Wingfoilonderdelen > Vleugelonderdelen: Wing-bladders; Wing-handvatten; Wing-ventielen
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Plovidba i vodeni sportovi > Wingfoiling > Dijelovi opreme za wingfoiling > Dijelovi za krila: Krilni mjehuri; Krilne ručke; Krilni ventili
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Boating & Water Sports > Wingfoiling > Wingfoil Parts > Wing Parts: Wing Bladders; Wing Handles; Wing Valves
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > ウォータースポーツ・アクティビティ > ウイングフォイル > ウイングフォイルパーツ > ウイングパーツ: ウィングブラダー; ウィングハンドル; ウィングバルブ
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Canoagem e esportes aquáticos > Wingfoiling > Peças de wingfoil > Peças da asa: Câmaras de ar para wings; Alças de wings; Válvulas de wings
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 划船/水上运动 > 风翼冲浪 > 风翼冲浪部件 > 风翼部件: 风翼内胆; 风翼把手; 风翼气门
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Boot- & Wassersport > Wingsurfen > Ersatzteile für Wingsurfen > Ersatzteile für Wings: Wing-Bladders; Wing-Handles; Wing-Ventile
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Deportes acuáticos y navegación deportiva > Wingfoiling > Piezas de wingfoil > Piezas de alas: Cámaras de aire para wingfoil; Asas para wingfoil; Válvulas para wingfoil
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Plimbări cu barca și sporturi nautice > Wingfoiling > Piese pentru wingfoiling > Piese pentru aripi: Camere de aer pentru aripi gonflabile; Mânere pentru aripi gonflabile; Valve pentru aripi gonflabile
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Lodě a vodní sporty > Wingfoiling > Wingfoil – součásti > Wing/Křídlo – součásti: Duše pro wingy; Madla pro wingy; Ventily pro wingy
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Гребля и водные виды спорта > Вингфойлинг > Компоненты для вингфойлинга > Детали крыла: Баллоны для вингов; Ручки для вингов; Клапаны для вингов